New York, session 2025-2026, A11503.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 603-a to 2 read as follows: 3 § 603-a. Separate tax on distributions from designated federal settle- 4 ment funds. (a) In lieu of any other tax imposed by section six hundred 5 one of this part, there is hereby imposed for each taxable year a sepa- 6 rate tax on distributions from a designated fund received by any resi- 7 dent individual, estate or trust during such taxable year. Such tax 8 shall be equal to one hundred percent of the gross amount of such 9 distributions and shall not be reduced pursuant to any deduction, 10 exemption, or credit otherwise authorized pursuant to law. 11 (b) For purposes of this section: 12 (i) "Designated fund" means the federal anti-weaponization fund estab- 13 lished pursuant to the settlement agreement in Trump v. Internal Revenue 14 Service, No. 1:26-cv-20609 (S.D. Fla.). 15 (ii) "Distribution" means any payment, distribution, or monetary 16 transfer received, either directly or indirectly, by a resident individ- 17 ual, estate or trust. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15964-01-6